errortag-src/twol-sme.txt
"Gradation: Clusters kc ks etc. 2"                         ! uk'sa:uvssa
  ':Cx <=> Vow: k: _ Cy Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (t c č s š)
			      Cy in (t c č s š)
			matched ;

"Gradation: Cluster kst 1"                                 ! teaks'ta:teavstta
  k:v <=> Vow: _ s ': t Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!€ teaks'taX4
!€ teavstta0


"Gradation: Cluster kst 2"                                 ! teaks'ta:teavstta
  ':t <=> Vow k: s _ t Vow: ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;

"Gradation: bb dd etc.1"                                   ! spábba:spáppat
  Cx:Cy <=> Vow: _ Cz: ( %>: ) ( »: ) Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (b d g z ž)
			      Cy in (p t k c č)
			      Cz in (b d g z ž)
			matched ;
!€ spábbaX4
!€ spáppa0


"Gradation: bb dd etc.2"                                   ! spábba:spáppat
  Cx:Cy <=> Vow: :Cy _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) ;
			where Cx in (b d g z ž)
			      Cy in (p t k c č)
			matched ;

!$ Szczecin
!$ Szccecin

!€ Szczecin
!€ Szczecin

"Gradation: dn to tn, etc."                                ! eadni:eatni
  Cx:Cy <=> Vow: _ Cz: Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (b d g )
			      Cy in (p t k )
			      Cz in (m n ŋ)
			matched ;
!€ eadniX4
!€ eatni0


"Gradation: dnj to tnj"                                    ! boadnji:boatnji
  d:t <=> Vow: _ n j Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!€ boadnjiX4
!€ boatnji0



! Lengthening of consonants
! -------------------------

! This takes place in certain verb forms, e.g. imperative and certain
! nominalisation forms.

"Lengthening of Central Consonants hk etc."                ! boah'tiY1:boahtti
  ':Cy <=> h: _ Cz Vow ( CntrCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) Len: ( »: ) ;
			where Cy in (p t k c č)
			      Cz in (p t k c č)
			matched ;
!€ boah'tiY1
!€ boahtti0

!€ dah'kaY7j
!€ dahkku0i



"Lengthening of Central Consonants pm etc."                ! dapmaY1:dabmi
  Cx:Cy <=> Vow: _ Cz Vow ( CntrCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) Len: ( »: ) ;
			where Cx in (p t k )
			      Cy in (b d g )
			      Cz in (m n ŋ)
			matched ;
!€ dapmaY1
!€ dabmi0

"Lengthening of Central Consonants tnj"
  t:d <=> Vow: _ n j Vow ( CntrCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) Len: ( »: ) ;
!€ bitnjuY1
!€ bidnju0

"Lengthening of Central Consonants dj"                     ! dad'jaY1:daddji
  ':d <=> Vow: d _ j Vow ( CntrCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) Len: ( »: ) ;
!€ dad'jaY1
!€ daddji0




! Lenition
! --------

"Lenition: Intervocalic Stops and Affricates"              ! joh'kaX4:jo00ga
  Cx:Cy <=> h:0 ':0 _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) Vow ( %>: ) ( »: ) ;
			where Cx in (k p c č t)
			      Cy in (g b z ž đ)
			matched ;
!€ joh'kaX4
!€ jo00ga0


! Here, the k is reduced to g as an automatic result of the h deletion in the
! "Gradation: h loss" rule.


!"Three-part compounding: Consonant geminates"						! giella:giel
! Cx:0 <=> Vow: _ Cy: Vow WeG: ;
! 			where Cx in (l r)
! 				  Cy in (l r)
!			matched ;

!"Three-part compounding: Consonant geminates II"					! giella:giel
! Vx:0 <=> Vow: Cx Cx _ ;
! 			where Vx in (a e i o u)
! 				  Cx in (l r) ;


!"Three-part compounding: -iv- consonant center"					! oaivi:oai
! v:0 <=> i: _ Vow WeG: ;

!"Three-part compounding: -iv- consonant center II"					! oaivi:oai
! i:0 <=> i: v:0 _ WeG: ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Start of non-normative compound shortening section !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
KEEPIF(SHORTCOMP)

! Compound shortening starts here
! -------------------------------


"d-deletion in compounding"
  d:0 =>                _ ': j: Vow:0 W3: ;             ! vuod'ja:vuoj-
                        _ d j Vow:0 W3: ;               ! áddjá:ádj-
         [ l | j: | v ] _ [ m: | n: | ŋ: ] Vow:0 W3: ;  ! geaidnu:geain-
                   Vow: _ d: Vow:0 W3: ;                ! gáddi:gád-

"j:i in compounding"
  j:i => Vow: d:0 ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;        ! vuoj:vuoi-
         Vow: _ [ b:0 | d:0 | g:0 ] [ n: | m: | ŋ: ] Vow:0 W3: ;  !geajdnu:geain-

"t-deletion in compounding"
  t:0 => _ n Vow:0 W3: ;                  ! vuotna:vuon-
         Vow: [ s | š ] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;  !Clusters st, št
         h: ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;            !Cluster ht

"Double:single cons. in compounding"    ! káffe:káf(f)-
  Cx:0 => Vow: _ Cy Vow:0 W3: ;
			where Cx in (đ f l m n ŋ r s š ŧ v)
			      Cy in (đ f l m n ŋ r s š ŧ v)
			matched ;


"Preaspirated Geminates in compounding part 1"  !áhčči:áhč(č)-
  Cx:0 => h: Cy: _ Vow:0 W3: ;
			where Cx in (k p t c č l r)
			      Cy in (k p t c č l r)
			matched ;

"Preaspirated Geminates in compounding part 2"  !áhčči:áh(č)-
  Cx:0 => h: _ Cy:0 Vow:0 W3: ;
			where Cx in (k p t c č l r)
			      Cy in (k p t c č l r)
			matched ;

"Preaspirated Geminates in compounding part 3"  !geahči:geaš-
  h:š => _ (':) č: (č:) Vow:0 W3: ;


"l:0 in compounding"   ! viellja:vie(l)lj-
  l:0 => Vow: _ l j Vow:0 W3: ;
         Vow: [ s | š ] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;       ! Clusters sl, šl
         Vow: [ v: | j: ] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;     !Cluster v/j + l


"n:0 in compounding"
  n:0 => Vow: _ n j Vow:0 W3: ;                 ! mannji:ma(n)nj-
         [ l | j: | v ] [ b:0 | d:0 | g:0 ] _ Vow:0 W3: ;   !jdn, vdn etc.


"Non-nasal Son. + Non-son. compounding part 1" ! láj'bi:lái(b)-
  Cx:0 => [l|r|đ|v|j:] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;
           where Cx in (f g d b k p t z ž c č s š) ;

"Non-nasal Sonorant + Non-sonorant compounding part 2"      ! láj'bi:láib(b)-
  ':Cx => Vow: [ l | r | đ | v | j: ] _ Cz Vow:0 W3: ;
			where Cx in (f g d b k p t z ž c č s š)
			      Cz in (f g d b k p t z ž c č s š)
			matched ;

"Non-nasal Son. + k compounding"              ! guoj'ka:guoih-
  k:h => [l|r|đ|v|j:] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;

"Non-nasal Son. + p compounding"
  p:h => [l|r|đ|v|j:] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;


"Non-nasal Son. + t compounding"
  t:h => [l|r|đ|v|j:] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;


"Non-nasal Son. + c compounding"
  c:h => [l|r|đ|v|j:] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;


"Non-nasal Son. + č compounding"
  č:h => [l|r|đ|v|j:] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;

"Cluster ŋ + g in compounding"          ! seaŋ'ga:seaŋg(g)-
  ':g => Vow: ŋ _ g Vow:0 W3: ;

"':k in compounding"
  ':k => Vow: ŋ _ k Vow:0 W3: ;                                ! báŋ'ku:báŋk(k)-
         Vow: [ t: | ŧ: ] _ k Vow:0 W3: ;              ! mát'ki:mátk(k)-
         Vow: [ s | š ] _ k: Vow:0 W3: ;               ! beas'ka:beask(k)-


"Cluster m + f in compounding"
  ':f => Vow: m _ f Vow:0 W3: ;

"Cluster m + b in compounding"
  ':b => Vow: m _ b Vow:0 W3: ;


"':p in compounding"             ! lám'pa:lámp(p)-
  ':p => Vow: m _ p Vow:0 W3: ;
         Vow: [ s | š ] _ p: Vow:0 W3: ;   !Clusters sp, šp


"':s in compounding"
  ':s => Vow: m _ s Vow:0 W3: ;
         Vow: k: _ s Vow:0 W3: ;    ! uk'sa:uvss-

"':š in compounding"
  ':š => Vow: m _ š Vow:0 W3: ;
         Vow: k: _ š Vow:0 W3: ;



"':t in compounding"
  ':t => Vow: m _ t Vow:0 W3: ;
         Vow: [ s | š ] _ t: Vow:0 W3: ;
         Vow: k:v _ t Vow:0 W3: ;
         Vow k:v s _ t Vow:0 W3: ;                       ! teaks'ta:teavstt-

"Cluster n + Non-sonorant in part 2"                       ! gán'da:gánd(d)-
  ':Cx => Vow: n _ Cz Vow:0 W3: ;
			where Cx in (d t z ž c č s š)
			      Cz in (d t z ž c č s š)
			matched ;


"Cluster v/j + r in compounding 1"            ! áj'ru:ái(r)-
  r:0 => Vow: [ v: | j: ] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;


"Cluster v/j + r in compounding 2"            ! jáv'ri:jávr(r)-
  ':r => Vow: [ j: | v ] _ r: Vow:0 W3: ;


! "':l in compounding"
!   ':l => Vow: [ j: | v ] _ l Vow:0 W3: ;            ! biev'la:bievl(l)-
!          Vow: [ s | š ] _ l: Vow:0 W3: ;            !Clusters sl, šl

! biev'laW3
! bievlla0


"Clusters lv, rv, đv in compounding 1"
 v:0 => Vow: [ đ | l | r ] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;     ! bal'va:bal(v)-
        Vow: [ s | š ] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;         !Clusters sv, šv
        Vow: j: ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;                ! beaj'vi:beai(v)-

"Clusters lj, rj, đj in compounding 2"        ! ol'ju:ol(j)-
  j:0 => Vow: [ đ | l | r | v ] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;

"':v in compounding"
  ':v => Vow: [ đ | l | r ] _ v Vow:0 W3: ;    ! bal'va:balv(v)-
         Vow: [ s | š ] _ v: Vow:0 W3: ;       !Clusters sv, šv etc.
         Vow: j: _ v Vow:0 W3: ;               ! beaj'vi:beaiv(v)-

"':j in compounding"
  ':j => Vow: [ đ | l | r ] _ j Vow:0 W3: ;         ! ol'ju:olj(j)-
         Vow: v: _ j: Vow:0 W3: ;                   ! čoav'ji:čoavj(j)-


"':m in compounding"
  ':m => Vow: [ t: | ŧ: ] _ m Vow:0 W3: ;               ! fát'mi:fátm(m)-
         Vow: [ s | š ] _ m: Vow:0 W3: ;                !Clusters sm, šm


"k:0 in compounding"
  k:0 => Vow: [ s | š ] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;                        ! beas'ka:beas(k)-
         h: ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;                                        !joh'ka:joh(k)

"p:0 in compounding"
  p:0 => Vow: [ s | š ] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;
         h: ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;


"m:0 in compounding"
  m:0 => Vow: [ s | š ] ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;
         [ l | j: | v ] [ b:0 | d:0 | g:0 ] _ Vow:0 W3: ;       ! čuolbma:čuol(m)-


"b:0 in compounding part"
  b:0 => [ l | j: | v ] _ [ m: | n: | ŋ: ] Vow:0 W3: ;      ! čuolbma:čuol(b)(m)-
         Vow: _ b: Vow:0 W3: ;                              ! spábba:spáb-



"g:0 in compounding"
  g:0 => [ l | j: | v ] _ [ m: | n: | ŋ: ] Vow:0 W3: ;
         Vow: _ g: Vow:0 W3: ;


"Clusters lbm, jdn, vdn etc. in compounding part 6"
  ŋ:0 => [ l | j: | v ] [ b:0 | d:0 | g:0 ] _ Vow:0 W3: ;

"Clusters lbm, jdn, vdn etc. in compounding part 7"                   ! čuolbma:čuolm(m)-
  Cx:Cy => [ l | j: | v ] _ Cz Vow:0 W3: ;
			where Cx in (b d g )
			      Cy in (m n ŋ)
			      Cz in (m n ŋ)
			matched ;

"k:v in compounding"
  k:v => Vow: _ ': [t:|c:|č:|s:|š:] Vow:0 W3: ;             ! uk'sa:uvs-
         Vow: _ s ': t Vow:0 W3: ;                          ! teaks'ta:teavst-

"Cluster kc in compounding"
  ':c => Vow: k: _ c Vow:0 W3: ;

"Cluster kč in compounding"
  ':č => Vow: k: _ č Vow:0 W3: ;


"Clusters bb dd etc. in compounding 1"                                   ! spábba:spább-
  Cx:Cy => Vow: _ Cz: Vow:0 W3: ;
			where Cx in (b d g z ž)
			      Cy in (p t k c č)
			      Cz in (b d g z ž)
			matched ;


"Clusters bb dd etc. in compounding 2"                                   ! spábba:spápp-
  Cx:Cy => :Cy _ Vow:0 W3: ;
			where Cx in (b d g z ž)
			      Cy in (p t k c č)
			matched ;


"Cluster zz in compounding"
  z:0 => Vow: _ z: Vow:0 W3: ;

"Cluster ž in compounding"
  ž:0 => Vow: _ ž: Vow:0 W3: ;


"Cluster bb in compounding 2"                                   ! spábba:spáp-
  b:p => Vow: b:0 _ Vow:0 W3: ;

"Cluster dd in compounding 2"
  d:t => Vow: d:0 _ Vow:0 W3: ;

"Cluster gg in compounding 2"
  g:k => Vow: g:0 _ Vow:0 W3: ;

"Cluster zz in compounding 2"
  z:c => Vow: z:0 _ Vow:0 W3: ;

"Cluster žž in compounding 2"
  ž:č => Vow: ž:0 _ Vow:0 W3: ;

"Cluster hc in compounding 1"
  c:0 => h: ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;

"Cluster hč in compounding 1"
  č:0 => h: ': _ Vow:0 W3: ;


"Cluster hk:g etc in compounding"                                    ! johka : jot-
  h:t => _ (':) [p:0|t:0|k:0|c:0|č:0] ([p:0|t:0|k:0|c:0|č:0]) Vow:0 W3: ;


"Cluster hp in compounding 2"
  p:t => h (':) _ (p:0) Vow:0 W3: ;

"Cluster hk in compounding 2"                                    ! johka : joht-
  k:t => h (':) _ (k:0) Vow:0 W3: ;

"Cluster hc in compounding 2"
  c:t => h (':) _ (c:0) Vow:0 W3: ;

"Cluster hč in compounding 2"
  č:t => h (':) _ (č:0) Vow:0 W3: ;

ENDKEEP
!!!!!!!!!!!!!! End of non-normative compound shortening section !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!Vowel shortening
!----------------


! Nouns

"Vowel Shortening in Compounds of Contract Stems"
  Vx:Vy <=> [ (Vow) Vow | á ] Cns:+ Cns: _ (StemCns:*) ( %>: ) ( »: ) [X4: X7:|X8:] ;
	    where Vx in (u i)
	          Vy in (o e)
	    matched ;

"Allegro Forms in Compounds"                   ! gáv'piX7:gáv0pe
 Vx:Vy <=> Cns:+ _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) (¤:) (StemCns:*) ( %>: ) ( »: ) X7: ;
           where Vx in (i u á)
                 Vy in (e o a)
           matched ;

!€ gáv'piX7
!€ gáv0pe0

!€ bassiX7
!€ basse0
